Oklahoma, session 2025, SB765.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.1 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Compact is hereby


enacted into law and the Governor shall enter into the Compact on

Req. No. 1200 Page 1


behalf of the State of Oklahoma with any jurisdiction legally joined


therein, in the form substantially as set forth in this act.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.2 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


INTERSTATE DENTAL AND DENTAL HYGIENE COMPACT


A. This Compact shall be known as the Interstate Dental and


Dental Hygiene Compact. The purpose of the Compact is to expedite


licensure and increase access to dental health care through state


licensing agencies acting in cooperation. The Compact adopts the


existing structures most utilized by state licensing agencies across


the United States, while ensuring the safety of the public through


the sharing of documents and information. The Compact ensures that


each state retains the right to impose an adverse action on a


licensee as a home state or as a practicing state. Each state has


an opportunity to share investigations and information with the home


state of licensure. The Compact is administered by state licensing


agencies, thus allowing for each state to maintain its sovereignty.


B. The Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Compact:


1. Allows for expedited licensure portability and ease of


movement between states;


2. Allows each state to continue to regulate the practice of


dentistry and dental hygiene within its borders and maintain its


sovereignty by allowing actions against a Compact license privilege

Req. No. 1200 Page 2


or a licensee and maintaining its existing licensure structure while


allowing for Compact licensure privileges;


3. Creates a common goal of protecting the public by ensuring a


uniform licensure standard and the sharing of information in the


Compact;


4. Allows for licensure in every participating state by passing


a uniform licensure examination that tests psychomotor and cognitive


dental skills exam that is currently accepted in fifty state


licensing jurisdictions and United States territories;


5. Gives licensees one location to maintain professional


documentation to expedite Compact license privileges in member


states;


6. Facilitates a faster licensure process for relocation or


separation of military members and their dependent spouses. There


are no Compact fees for military members or their spouses;


7. Alleviates a duplicative process for licensure among


multiple states;


8. Saves applicants money by not having to obtain duplicate


documents from a source that charges for the documents; and


9. Utilizes existing infrastructure of the American Association


of Dental Boards, which has been in existence for over one hundred


(100) years representing dental licensing agencies.





Req. No. 1200 Page 3


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.3 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “AADB” means the American Association of Dental Boards or


its named successor, formerly known as the American Association of


Dental Examiners (AADE), originally chartered on September 10, 1896,


and renewed in 1944, comprised of state dental licensing agencies in


the United States and its territories;


2. “Active-duty military member” means an individual in full-


time active-duty status in the active uniformed service of the


United States including members of the National Guard and Reserve.


The legal spouse of the military member must be recognized by the


military unit as a dependent while the service member is on active


duty. Spouses shall receive the same privileges as military members


for the purpose of this Compact;


3. “Active investigation” means an active investigation


resulting in formal allegations or charges precipitating a judicial


process by a licensing agency, oversight agency, or other law


enforcement entity;


4. “Adverse action” means an order issued by a state licensing


agency or reported to the clearinghouse pursuant to the Compact


bylaws and rules. The term includes, but is not limited to, a



Req. No. 1200 Page 4


temporary emergency or substantially equivalent action, even when


such order is later withdrawn by a licensing agency;


5. “ADEX examination” means the American Board of Dental


Examiners examination;


6. “Bylaws” means the bylaws passed by the Compact Commission;


7. “Clearinghouse” means the AADB clearinghouse and databank,


or its successor entity, that houses prior adverse actions, orders,


and denials of licensure or permits from state licensing agencies in


the United States and its territories;


8. “CODA” means the Commission on Dental Accreditation or its


successor as approved by the United States Department of Education;


9. “Compact” means the Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene


Compact;


10. “Compact Commission” or “Commission” means the Interstate


Dental and Dental Hygiene Compact Commission created pursuant to


Section 4 of this Compact;


11. “Compact Commission Attorneys’ Committee” means attorneys


that currently represent a state licensing agency. The Attorneys’


Committee participates in the commission as a nonvoting member. An


attorney that has previously served as an attorney for a state


licensing agency may be invited on a year-to-year basis to serve on


the committee if they have not engaged in an official case against a


licensing agency of a Compact member state or have any other


conflict of interest. The Attorneys’ Committee may assist the

Req. No. 1200 Page 5


investigators in working through joint investigation issues between


states. The Attorneys’ Committee shall prepare a summary of legal


issues directly dealing with the Compacts at the annual meeting as


well as a legal update for issues affecting member state licensing


agencies;


12. “Compact license privilege” means the expedited dental or


dental hygiene license to practice in a member state that differs


from the licensee’s home state;


13. “Conviction” means an adjudication or formal judgment by a


court that an individual is guilty through a plea of guilty or no


contest, or a finding of guilt by the court. Evidence of a


conviction of a criminal offense by the court shall be considered


final for the purposes of disciplinary action by a licensing agency;


14. “Criminal background check” means a dentist or dental


hygienist seeking Compact license privileges shall complete and


provide a criminal background check, including the use of the


results of fingerprint or other biometric data checks compliant with


the requirements of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, with the


exception of federal employees who have suitability determination in


accordance with 5 C.F.R., Section 731.202;


15. “Dental hygienist” means any person who:


a. has successfully graduated from a CODA approved dental


hygiene school,



Req. No. 1200 Page 6


b. has successfully passed the American Board of Dental


Examiners (ADEX) licensure exam, or has been in


practice five (5) years or more and has successfully


passed a regional or equivalent state-administered


psychomotor licensure examination prior to January 1,


2024,


c. has successfully passed the written national dental


hygiene board examination administered by the Joint


Commission on National Dental Examinations,


d. possesses a full and unrestricted dental hygiene


license issued by a member state of the Compact,


e. has never been convicted, received adjudication,


deferred adjudication, community supervision, or


deferred disposition for any offense by a court of


appropriate jurisdiction,


f. has never been a subject of discipline by a licensing


agency through any adverse action, order, or other


restriction of the licensee by the licensing agency


with the exception of failure to pay fees or failure


to complete continuing education,


g. is not currently under active investigation by a


licensing agency or law enforcement authority in any


state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, and



Req. No. 1200 Page 7


h. meets any jurisprudence requirement established by a


member state licensing agency in which a licensee is


seeking a Compact privilege expedited license;


16. “Dental Practice Act” means the laws and regulations


governing the practice of dentistry within a member state;


17. “Dentist” means any person who:


a. has successfully graduated from a CODA approved dental


school,


b. has successfully passed the American Board of Dental


Examiners (ADEX) licensure exam, or has been in


practice five (5) years or more and has successfully


passed a regional or equivalent state-administered


psychomotor licensure examination prior to January 1,


2024,


c. has successfully passed the written National Dental


Board Examination administered by the Joint Commission


on National Dental Examinations,


d. possesses a full and unrestricted dental license


issued by a member state licensing agency,


e. has never been convicted, received adjudication,


deferred adjudication, community supervision, or


deferred disposition for any offense by a court of


appropriate jurisdiction,



Req. No. 1200 Page 8


f. has never been a subject of discipline by a licensing


agency as determined by the Compact bylaws and rules,


through any adverse action, order, or other


restriction of the licensee by the licensing agency


with the exception of failure to pay fees or failure


to complete continuing education,


g. has never had a state or federal drug registration,


permit, or license restricted, suspended, or revoked


by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration


or any state agency that oversees controlled substance


registrations,


h. is not currently under active investigation by a


licensing agency or law enforcement authority in any


state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, and


i. meets any jurisprudence requirement established by a


member state licensing agency in which a licensee is


seeking a Compact privilege expedited license;


18. “Home state” means the state of primary licensure. It is


the location of the practicing dentist or dental hygienist license


where Compact privileges originate and the licensee practices at


least twenty-five percent (25%) of the time within a calendar year.


The home state may take an action against a licensee regardless of


where an action against a licensee occurred;



Req. No. 1200 Page 9


19. “Licensing agency” means the agency, board, or other entity


of a state that is responsible for the licensing of dentists and


dental hygienists;


20. “Member state” means a state or United States territory


that has enacted the Compact;


21. “Regional board examination” means the Western Regional


Dental Board Examination (WREB), the North East Regional Board of


Dental Examiners (NERB), the Commission on Dental Competency


Assessments (CDCA), Council of AADB Compact Testing Agencies (CITA),


Southern Regional Testing Agency (SRTA), Central Regional Dental


Testing Services (CRDTS);


22. “Repository” means the AADB repository, or its successor


entity, of original documents of a licensee that may include


original transcripts, certification documents, test scores, military


training records, previous or current licensing documents, and other


sources of materials needed for applications and verification. The


repository shall receive documents from primary or originating


sources and verify their authenticity;


23. “Scope of practice” means the dental-related procedures


that require a license, permit, or training to undertake the


treatment and procedure to be completed on a patient within the


practice state’s requirements;


24. “State” means a state within the United States or a United


States Territory; and

Req. No. 1200 Page 10


25. “State jurisprudence” means the knowledge of the state laws


and rules of dentistry and dental hygiene in which a Compact license


privilege is extended.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.4 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The member states hereby establish the Interstate Dental and


Dental Hygiene Compact. Each state shall enact the Compact in a


form that is not materially different from the model Compact as


determined by the Compact Commission.


B. Each member state shall have two voting members on the


Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Compact Commission, to be


appointed by the state licensing agency. Such members shall serve


as commissioners and have one vote each, cumulatively making up the


Compact Commission. Member states with separate licensing agencies


for dentists and dental hygienists shall appoint one commissioner


from each licensing agency. Commissioners may not delegate votes or


proxies; however, if a commissioner is unable to attend, the member


state may substitute a delegate that meets the same requirements.


C. Upon five states joining the Compact, the Compact shall


become active. The Compact Commission shall have the authority to


enact bylaws and rules on behalf of the Compact that shall have the


force of law in each participating state to carry out the provisions


of the Compact.

Req. No. 1200 Page 11


D. The Interstate Dental and Dental Hygiene Compact shall be a


distinct, standalone entity; separate and apart from the American


Association of Dental Boards.


E. The Compact Commission shall meet at least once per calendar


year and additional times as necessary pursuant to the bylaws and


rules.


F. The Compact Commission shall elect officers from the


membership that shall serve as an Executive Committee. Elections


shall occur during the annual meeting. The quorum of commissioners


shall select an Executive Committee consisting of a chair, vice


chair, secretary, treasurer, and a representative from the north,


south, east, and west districts as divided pursuant to the Compact


rules. All officers shall serve one-year terms.


G. Quorum for purposes of conducting business shall be a


majority of Commission members attending in person or virtually.


H. The Commission shall provide notice of all meetings on its


website and in other communications to members.


I. A vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the membership shall be


required for an executive session to discuss:


1. Items specifically related to participation in a lawsuit or


in anticipation of a legal proceeding;


2. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal


statute;



Req. No. 1200 Page 12


3. Discussions of investigative records of an active Compact


member investigation or investigative records for law enforcement or


discussions involving specifically accusing a person of a crime or a


public censure;


4. Discussions that would include information of a personal


nature that would constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal


privacy;


5. Anything considered internal practices and procedures or a


trade secret;


6. Other items in the Commission bylaws allowing for executive


sessions to be called; or


7. Advice of legal counsel.


J. The Commission shall keep minutes and make them available to


all member states.


K. The Commission may establish other committees as needed.


L. The Commission shall prepare an annual report that shall be


made available electronically to the legislatures and governors of


the member states concerning the activities of the Compact


Commission during the preceding calendar year. Such reports shall


also include reports of financial audits and any recommendations


that may have been adopted by the Compact Commission.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.5 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 1200 Page 13


A. Member states agree to submit member state licensing agency


actions and other documents and data as determined by the Compact


Commission through bylaws and rules.


B. Member states shall notify the Compact Commission pursuant


to the rules regarding any adverse action taken by the licensing


agency, any active investigation by the licensing agency, and any


active investigation involving pending criminal charges or other


circumstances as determined by the Compact Commission rules and


bylaws.


C. Any adverse action, order, restriction, or denial of a


license or permit on a licensee or permit holder shall be reported


to the Compact Commission clearinghouse by the member state


licensing agency.


D. Member state licensing agencies may submit nonpublic


complaints, disciplinary or investigatory information not required


by subsection C of this section to the clearinghouse. All


investigatory material shall be considered confidential and not part


of a public record unless otherwise specifically required by state


statute.


E. Member state licensing agencies shall accept continuing


education credits as required by each state including, but not


limited to, classes authorized by AADB Accredited Continuing


Education (ACE) program.



Req. No. 1200 Page 14


F. Documents in the Compact Commission repository shall be


treated by a member state as the equivalent of a primary or original


source document for licensure.


G. Member states agree to accept a standardized application for


Compact license privileges. The standardized application shall be


established by the rules enacted by the Compact Commission.


H. As part of the Compact enforcement, participating member


states issuing subpoenas and seeking testimony of witnesses shall be


enforced in other participating member states in the Compact and


shall be enforced by a court of competent jurisdiction where the


witnesses or evidence is located.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.6 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Compact Commission shall have the power and duty to:


1. Oversee and maintain the administration of the Compact


including the organizational needs, the financial activities, the


hiring of personnel, and the ongoing activities or needs of the


Compact Commission;


2. Promulgate bylaws and rules to operate the Compact;


3. Establish a budget and make expenditures;


4. Issue, upon the request of a member state licensing agency,


advisory opinions concerning the meaning or interpretation of the


Compact and its bylaws, rules, and actions;

Req. No. 1200 Page 15


5. Enforce compliance with Compact provisions, the rules


promulgated by the Compact Commission, and the bylaws using all


necessary and proper means including, but not limited to, the use of


judicial process;


6. Hold an annual meeting for the Compact Commission where the


elections of an Executive Committee and other issues may be


discussed and voted on;


7. Establish personnel policies and programs relating to


conflicts of interest, rates of compensation, and qualifications of


personnel;


8. Accept donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies,


materials, and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of


them in a manner consistent with the conflict-of-interest policies


established by the Compact Commission;


9. As required by Section 4(L) of this Compact, report annually


to the legislatures and governors of the member state licensing


agencies concerning the activities of the Compact Commission during


the preceding calendar year. Such reports shall also include


reports of financial audits and any recommendations that may have


been adopted by the Compact Commission; and


10. Coordinate education, training, and public awareness


regarding the Compact, its implementation, and its operation.


B. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on


behalf of the Compact Commission with the exception of rulemaking

Req. No. 1200 Page 16


during periods when the Compact Commission is not in session. When


acting on behalf of the Compact Commission, the Executive Committee


shall oversee the administration of the Compact including


enforcement and compliance of the Compact.


C. The officers and employees of the Compact Commission shall


be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their


official capacity, for a claim for damage to or loss of property or


personal injury or other civil liability caused or arising out of,


or relating to, an actual or alleged act, error, or omission that


occurred, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing


occurred, within the scope of Compact Commission employment, duties,


or responsibilities; provided, such person shall not be protected


from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused


by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person.


D. The liability of the executive director and employees of the


Compact Commission or representatives of the Compact Commission,


acting within the scope of such person’s employment or duties for


acts, errors, or omissions occurring within such person’s state may


not exceed the limits of liability set forth under the constitution


and laws of that state for state officials, employees, and agents.


The Compact Commission is considered to be an instrumentality of the


states for the purposes of any such action. Nothing in this


subsection shall be construed to protect such person from suit or



Req. No. 1200 Page 17


liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the


intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person.


E. The Compact Commission shall defend the executive director,


its employees, and, subject to the approval of the attorney general


or other appropriate legal counsel of the member state represented


by a Compact Commission representative, shall defend such Compact


Commission representative in any civil action seeking to impose


liability arising out of an actual or alleged act, error, or


omission that occurred within the scope of Compact Commission


employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the defendant had a


reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Compact


Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that


the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from


intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such


person.


F. To the extent not covered by the laws of any state involved,


a member state, the Compact Commission, or the representatives or


employees of the Compact Commission shall be held harmless in the


amount of a settlement or judgment, including attorney fees and


costs, obtained against such persons arising out of an actual or


alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of


Compact Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that


such persons had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within


the scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or

Req. No. 1200 Page 18


responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or


omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton


misconduct on the part of such persons.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.7 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A dentist or dental hygienist applying for Compact license


privileges shall meet the requirements established in applicable


definitions listed Section 3 of this Compact and hold a current


valid license in a member state under this Compact.


B. Notwithstanding any provision of this Compact or state law


to the contrary, each member state agrees to issue an expedited


state license within ten (10) days of a completed application


pursuant to 50 U.S.C., Section 4025(a) to an active duty military


member or spouse.


C. Each dentist or dental hygienist shall designate a home


state of licensure. The home state shall be determined by:


1. The state of primary residence for the dentist or dental


hygienist where twenty-five percent (25%) of his or her practice


within one (1) year occurs. An active-duty military member or his


or her spouse may choose a home state as designated with the


military but are not required to meet the twenty-five percent (25%)


practice within the home state requirement; or



Req. No. 1200 Page 19


2. If no state qualifies under paragraph 1 of this subsection,


then the state where the dentist or dental hygienist filed the


previous year federal tax return.


D. A dentist or dental hygienist may redesignate a home state


one time in a calendar year, if the qualifications of a home state


are met.


E. A dentist or dental hygienist seeking a Compact license


privilege shall apply to his or her home state for a letter stating


that he or she is eligible for Compact license privileges.


F. The home state shall determine the eligibility of the


applicant and shall issue a letter of approval or denial for the


Compact license privilege.


G. The letter shall be submitted to the proposed Compact


license state along with:


1. The completed Compact application packet;


2. Authorization to seek access to the licensee’s repository


documents;


3. Any additional information as may be required by the


proposed Compact license state; and


4. Any required fees.


H. Upon approval from the home state, the Compact license state


shall issue a state Compact license privilege from the proposed


application state to the applicant.



Req. No. 1200 Page 20


I. Appeals on determination of eligibility shall be made to the


home state where the applicant was seeking privileges under a state


Compact license privilege and shall be subject to the law of that


state.


J. A person holding a Compact license privilege shall notify


the Compact Commission within ten (10) business days of any adverse


action taken against a license held in a non-Compact state.


K. A Compact license privilege may be revoked, suspended, or


limited by the issuing state licensing agency if at any time the


licensee’s home state license is revoked, suspended, or limited.


L. The Compact Commission is authorized to develop rules


regarding the application and renewal process including payment of


any application fees, and the issuance of a Compact license


privilege.


M. Eligibility or ineligibility to receive a state Compact


license privilege shall not impact or prohibit an individual from


the ability to seek a state license through the regular process


outside of the Compact.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.8 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Each dentist or dental hygienist holding a Compact license


privilege is required to reference the member state licensing


agency’s statutes and rules to be aware of laws that apply to a

Req. No. 1200 Page 21


specific state in which they are practicing under a Compact license


privilege. Compact license scope and practice requirements shall


conform to the state jurisdiction in which the Compact license


privilege holder is practicing.


B. Each dentist or dental hygienist holding a Compact license


privilege shall list a current address with the Compact Commission


that shall serve as his or her official address of service.


C. A dentist or dental hygienist holding a Compact license


privilege may have an adverse action taken against him or her by


the:


1. Member state licensing agency in a state in which the


dentist or dental hygienist:


a. is practicing with a Compact license privilege, or


b. has requested or received a Compact license privilege


to practice; or


2. Compact licensee’s home state.


D. Any state in which the Compact licensee holds a Compact


license privilege may investigate an allegation of a violation of


the statutes and rules of dentistry or dental hygiene in any other


state where the Compact licensee holds a Compact license privilege.


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.9 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 1200 Page 22


A. The Compact Commission is authorized to develop rules


regarding fees for Compact licensees’ use of the repository and


other provisions as determined by the Compact Commission.


B. A member state licensing agency issuing a Compact license


privilege authorizing practice in their state may impose a fee for a


Compact license privilege to be issued or renewed.


C. No Compact fee shall be required of each active-duty


military member or his or her spouse up to one (1) year after


completion of the military member’s service. Each participating


state issuing a Compact license privilege may waive fees for active-


duty military and his or her spouse as required by each individual


state statute.


D. Active-duty military may transfer military training records


to the repository without a fee.


SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.10 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Each state shall name a point of contact for joint


investigations between Compact member state licensing agencies.


B. In addition to the authority granted to a member state


licensing agency by the state law of their jurisdiction, member


state licensing agencies may participate with other member state


licensing agencies in joint investigations of licensees that fall


subject to this Compact.

Req. No. 1200 Page 23


C. Member state licensing agencies may share investigative,


litigation, or other materials in furtherance of any joint or


individual investigation arising with a licensee who holds a Compact


license privilege within their jurisdiction.


D. A subpoena issued by a member state or member state


licensing agencies shall be enforceable in other member states as


allowed by law.


E. If a licensee has a disciplinary action taken by any member


state licensing agency against a licensee under the Compact, he or


she shall automatically be subject to discipline by other member


state licensing agencies.


F. If a licensee has an action taken against his or her home


state license including being revoked, surrendered, or relinquished


in lieu of discipline or suspension, then automatically all other


Compact license privileges shall be placed in the same status. The


home state shall notify the Compact Commission and the Compact


Commission shall issue a notice to all member state licensing


agencies that the licensee holding a Compact license privilege shall


suspend the Compact license privilege.


G. If discipline is taken against a licensee in an Compact


member state, the member state licensing agency shall notify the


Compact Commission and the home state of the licensee. The home


state may deem the action conclusive as a matter of law and fact


decided and:

Req. No. 1200 Page 24


1. Impose the same or lesser sanction consistent with the home


state practice act; or


2. Pursue separate actions against the licensee under its


practice act regardless of the sanctions pursued by the Compact


member state licensing agency.


SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.11 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Insurance companies and entities verifying documents for the


purpose of licenses extended to a provider may seek information from


the Compact Commission clearinghouse for public record documents.


B. A dentist or dental hygienist, as defined by the bylaws and


rules, may submit a request to the Compact Commission to allow any


hiring employer, entity, or insurance company to access documents


from the repository for the purposes of credentialing, licensing, or


other privileges.


C. The Commission shall set a fee schedule for these services


in the bylaws and rules.


SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.12 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Compact Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in


order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of the


Compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the Compact

Req. No. 1200 Page 25


Commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is


beyond the scope of the purposes of the Compact, or the powers


granted hereunder, then such an action by the Compact Commission may


be determined to be invalid and have no force or effect.


B. Rules deemed appropriate for the operations of the Compact


Commission shall be made pursuant to a rulemaking process that


substantially conforms to the Model State Administrative Procedure


Act of 2010, and subsequent amendments thereto.


SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.13 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state


government in each member state licensing agencies shall enforce the


Compact and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to


effectuate the Compact’s purposes and intent to allow for expedited


licensure for the purpose of mobility. The provisions of the


Compact and the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as


statutory law, but shall not override existing state authority to


regulate the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene.


B. All courts may take judicial notice of the Compact and the


rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state


pertaining to the subject matter of the Compact which may affect the


powers, responsibilities, or actions of the Compact Commission.



Req. No. 1200 Page 26


C. The Compact Commission shall be entitled to receive all


service of process in any such proceeding and shall have standing to


intervene in the proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide


service of process to the Compact Commission shall render a judgment


or order void as to the Compact Commission, the Compact, or


promulgated rules.


SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.14 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Compact Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its


discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of the Compact.


B. The grounds for default include, but are not limited to,


failure of a member state to perform such obligations or


responsibilities imposed upon it by the Compact, or the rules and


bylaws of the Compact Commission promulgated under the Compact.


C. If the Compact Commission determines that a member state has


defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities


under the Compact, or the bylaws or promulgated rules, the Compact


Commission shall:


1. Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other


member states of the nature of the default, the means of curing the


default, and any action taken by the Compact Commission. The


Compact Commission shall specify the conditions by which the


defaulting state must cure its default; and

Req. No. 1200 Page 27


2. Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance


regarding the default.


D. If the defaulting state fails to cure the default, the


defaulting state shall be terminated from the Compact upon an


affirmative vote of a majority of the commissioners and all rights,


privileges, and benefits conferred by the Compact shall terminate on


the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not


relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred


during the period of the default.


E. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed


only after all other means of securing compliance have been


exhausted. Notice of intent to terminate shall be given by the


Compact Commission to the governor, the majority and minority


leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, and each of the


member states.


F. The Compact Commission shall establish rules and procedures


to address licenses and Compact license privilege holders that are


materially impacted by the termination of a member state or the


withdrawal of a member state.


G. The Compact Commission shall not bear any costs relating to


any state that has been found to be in default or which has been


terminated from the Compact, unless otherwise mutually agreed upon


in writing between the Compact Commission and the defaulting state.



Req. No. 1200 Page 28


H. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Compact


Commission by petitioning the federal district where the Compact


Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be


awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney


fees.


I. The Compact Commission shall not bear any costs relating to


any state that has been found to be in default or which has been


terminated from the Compact, unless otherwise mutually agreed upon


in writing between the Compact Commission and the defaulting state.


J. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of


the Compact Commission. The Compact Commission may avail itself of


any other remedies available under state law or the regulation of a


profession.


SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.15 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Compact Commission shall attempt, upon the request of a


member state licensing agency, to resolve disputes which are subject


to the Compact and which may arise among member state licensing


agencies.


B. The Compact Commission shall promulgate rules providing for


both mediation and binding dispute resolution, as appropriate.





Req. No. 1200 Page 29


SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.16 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any state is eligible to become a member state of the


Compact.


B. The Compact shall become effective and binding upon


legislative enactment of the Compact into law by no less than five


states. Thereafter, it shall become effective and binding on a


state upon enactment of the Compact into law by that state.


C. The governors of nonmember states, or their designees, shall


be invited to participate in the activities of the Compact


Commission on a nonvoting basis prior to adoption of the Compact by


all states.


D. The Compact Commission may propose amendments to the Compact


for enactment by the member states. No amendment shall become


effective and binding upon the Compact Commission and the member


states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent


of the member states.


SECTION 17. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.17 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Once effective, the Compact shall continue in force and


remain binding upon each and every member state; provided, that a


member state may withdraw from the Compact after giving appropriate

Req. No. 1200 Page 30


notice by specifically repealing the statute which enacted the


Compact into law.


B. Withdrawal from the Compact shall be by the enactment of a


statute repealing the same. The individual’s Compact license


privilege shall remain in effect for six (6) months from the date of


the member state licensing agency’s withdrawal.


C. The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chair of


the Compact Commission in writing upon the introduction of


legislation repealing the Compact in the withdrawing state.


D. The Compact Commission shall notify the other member states


of the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw within sixty (60) days


of its receipt of notice provided under subsection C of this


section.


E. Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall


occur upon the withdrawing state reenacting the Compact or upon such


later date as determined by the Compact Commission.


F. The Compact Commission is authorized to develop rules to


address the impact of the withdrawal of a member state on licenses


granted in other member states to dentists and dental hygienists who


designated the withdrawing member state as the state of principal


license.


SECTION 18. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.18 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 1200 Page 31


A. The Compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the


withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the


membership in the Compact to one member state.


B. Upon the dissolution of the Compact, the Compact becomes


null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the


business and affairs of the Compact Commission shall be concluded


and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the


bylaws.


SECTION 19. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.19 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The provisions of the Compact shall be severable, and if any


phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the


remaining provisions of the Compact shall be enforceable.


B. The provisions of the Compact shall be liberally construed


to effectuate its purposes.


SECTION 20. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.20 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of


a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.


B. All lawful actions of the Compact Commission, including all


rules and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the


member states.

Req. No. 1200 Page 32


C. All agreements between the Compact Commission and the member


states are binding in accordance with their terms.


D. In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the


constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member


state, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the


conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that


member state.


SECTION 21. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 329.21 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The most current edition of the American Institute of


Parliamentarians Standard Code of Parliamentary Procedure governs


all meetings of the Compact Commission, including its committees, in


those situations not otherwise covered in the bylaws.


SECTION 22. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1200 DC 1/19/2025 5:42:54 AM















Req. No. 1200 Page 33